Missouri, session 2026, HB3350.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 389, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 389.1100, to read as follows:
389.1100. 1. No railroad operating within this state shall operate, or permit to be
operated, any train exceeding eight thousand five hundred feet in total length on any
main track or branch line.
2. The department of transportation shall have authority to adopt rules and
standards to implement and enforce this section, including procedures for
measurement, exemptions for specific routes, and penalties for violations. Any rule
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.